Louisiana, session 2026, HB427.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2717.4 (B)(3) through (10) and (C)(1), (4), and (5), are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2717.4. Kids Online Protection and Anti-Grooming Act
* * *
B. For purposes of this Section:
* * *
(3) "Material harmful to minors" has the same meaning as provided in R.S.
51:2121.
(3) (4)(a) "Microtransaction" means any of the following:
(i) A purchase made in an online video game involving surprise mechanics,
new characters, or other in-game items.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 427 ENROLLED
(ii) A purchase made using a virtual currency that is purchasable or
redeemable using cash or credit that is included as part of a paid subscription service.
(iii) Any purchase or transfer of virtual currency on a covered platform.
(b) The term shall does not include a purchase made in an online video game
using a virtual currency that is earned through game play and is not otherwise
purchasable or redeemable using cash or credit or included as part of a paid
subscription service.
(4) (5) "Minor" means an account holder on the covered platform who
resides in this state under circumstances where the covered platform reasonably
believes or has actual knowledge that the account holder is under the age of sixteen
and is not emancipated or married has the same meaning as provided in R.S.
9:2717.2.
(5) (6) "Nonprofit corporation" means any organization organized on a
not-for-profit basis under pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 2 of Title 12 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
(6) (7)(a) "Online platform" means any public website, online service, online
application, or mobile application that predominantly provides a community forum
for user-generated content, such as sharing videos, images, games, audio files, or
other content, including a social media service, social network, or virtual reality
environment.
(b) A website, online service, online application, or mobile application is not
an online platform solely on the basis that it includes a chat, comment, or other
interactive function that is incidental to its predominant purpose.
(7) (8) "Online video game" means a video game, including an educational
video game, that accesses the internet and allows the user to do any of the following:
(a) Create and upload content that is not incidental to game play such as
character or level designs.
(b) Engage in microtransactions within the game.
(c) Communicate with other users.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 427 ENROLLED
(8) (9) "Precise geolocation" means information derived from technology,
including but not limited to global positioning system level latitude and longitude
coordinates or other mechanisms, that directly identify the specific location of a
natural person with precision and accuracy within a radius of one thousand seven
hundred fifty feet. The provisions of this definition shall do not extend to the content
of communications.
(9) (10) "School" means any child daycare center as defined in R.S.
17:407.33, any public or nonpublic school enrolling students in prekindergarten
through grade twelve, any institution under the management and supervision of a
public postsecondary education management board, any nonpublic college or
university, any program or initiative of the Board of Regents, or any proprietary
school as defined in R.S. 17:3140.1.
(10) "Sexually explicit material" shall have the same meaning as provided
in R.S. 25:225.
C. Every owner or operator of a covered platform who contracts with a
minor, including the creation of an online account, shall owe a duty of care to the
minor. The duty of care shall require the covered platform to take reasonable
measures in the operation of the covered platform to prioritize the privacy of the
minor's account and establish the following default privacy settings for minors:
(1) Prohibit an adult from connecting to a minor without express consent
from the minor's legal representative or enable the legal representative of a minor to
access a list of the connections of the minor, including a list of contacts with whom
the minor has exchanged direct messages through the parental supervision tools of
the covered platform.
* * *
(4) Restrict the visibility of the minor's account to only connected accounts
Set minor accounts to private mode in a manner in which only users to whom the
minor is connected on the covered platform may view or respond to content posted
by the minor.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 427 ENROLLED
(5) Allow the legal representative of a minor to choose to be informed via
text, voice, email, through the legal representative's linked account or through the
covered platform's parental control interface within a reasonable time, if any of the
following occur:
(a) A minor is exposed to sexually explicit material harmful to minors on a
covered platform.
(b) A connection is made between a minor and any other user on a covered
platform unless the legal representative of the minor is connected to the account of
the minor through the covered platform's parental supervision tools.
* * *
Section 2. Section 2 of Act No. 236 of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature
of Louisiana is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 3. Section 1 of Act No. 236 of the 2025 Regular Session and the provisions
of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.